Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5301.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 40113. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or a department order authorized under section 40107 for a specified animal, a person an individual shall not use an artificial light in taking game or in an area frequented by animals; throw or cast the rays of a spotlight, headlight, or other artificial light in a field, woodland, or forest while having a bow or firearm or other weapon capable of shooting a projectile in the person's individual's possession or under the person's individual's control unless otherwise permitted by law. A licensed hunter may use an artificial light 1 hour 2 hours before and 1 hour 2 hours after shooting hours while in possession of any unloaded firearm or bow and traveling afoot to and from the licensed hunter's hunting location. (2) Except as otherwise provided in a department order authorized under section 40107, a person an individual shall not throw, cast, or cause to be thrown or cast, the rays of an artificial light from December 1 to October 31 between the hours of 11 p.m. and 6 a.m. for the purpose of locating animals. Except as otherwise permitted by law or an order of the department, from November 1 to November 30, a person an individual shall not throw, cast, or cause to be thrown or cast, the rays of a spotlight, headlight, or other artificial light for the purpose of locating animals. This subsection does not apply to any of the following: (a) A peace officer while in the performance of the officer's duties. (b) A person An individual operating an emergency vehicle in an emergency. (c) An employee of a public or private utility while working in the scope of his or her that individual's employment. (d) A person An individual operating a vehicle with headlights in a lawful manner upon a street, highway, or roadway. (e) A person An individual using an artificial light to identify a house or mailbox number. (f) The use of artificial lights used to conduct a census by the department. (g) A person An individual using an artificial light from November 1 to November 30 on property that is owned by that person individual or by a member of that person's individual's immediate family. (3) The operator of a vehicle from which the rays of an artificial light have been cast in a clear attempt to locate game shall immediately stop the vehicle upon the request of if requested by a uniformed peace officer or when signaled by a peace officer with a flashing signal light or siren from a marked patrol vehicle.